test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v3_ele_ajatella_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - ajatella - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     ajatella+V+Inf: ajatella
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ajattelen
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ajattelet
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ajattellee
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ajattelema
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ajatteletta
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ajatelhaan
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ajattelin
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ajattelit
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ajatteli
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ajattelima
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ajattelitta
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ajatelthiin
     ajatella+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: ajatellu
     ajatella+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: ajateltu
     ajatella+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: ajatelheet
     ajatella+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: ajattelleeva
     ajatella+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: ajattelleevat
     ajatella+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: ajateltava
     ajatella+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: ajateltavat

     ajatella+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: ajattelisin
     ajatella+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: ajattelisit
     ajatella+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: ajattelis
     ajatella+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: ajattelisimma
     ajatella+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: ajattelisitta
     ajatella+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: ajateltais
     ajatella+V+Pass+Cond: ajateltais

     ajatella+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: ajattele
     ajatella+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: ajatelkkaa
     
     ajatella+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: ajattelemassa
     ajatella+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: ajattelemasta
     ajatella+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: ajattelemhaan
     ajatella+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: ajattelemalla
     ajatella+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: ajattelematta
